California, session 20252026, AB2535.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Ultraprocessed foods, which are high in added sugars, unhealthy fats, sodium, and calories, while low in essential nutrients and fiber, now account for over 60 percent of children’s calorie intake in the United States, including California. This overconsumption is linked to serious health risks and chronic diseases later in life.(b) California locally grown and raised whole food products offers a healthier alternative, as these fresh and nutrient-dense options provide higher levels of vitamins, minerals, and fiber that support children’s physical and cognitive development while reducing reliance on ultraprocessed options.(c) Expanding access to locally sourced products supports California’s agricultural economy, bolsters family farms, and promotes sustainability by reducing transportation-related environmental impacts, while helping reconnect Californians with the origins of their food supply.(d) It is the intent of the Legislature to reduce consumption of ultraprocessed foods by expanding access to California locally grown and raised whole food products, which are among the healthiest and most nutritious available, meeting the highest standards for quality, safety, and sustainability.SEC. 2. Section 18700 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:18700. (a) (1) It is hereby declared to be the established policy of the state that every human being has the right to access sufficient locally grown and raised, affordable and healthy food.(2) Food insecurity is defined as the occasional or constant lack of access to the food one needs to live a healthy life and the uncertainty of being able to acquire enough food to meet the needs of an individual or household due to insufficient money or other resources.(b) (1) All relevant state agencies, including, but not limited to, the State Department of Social Services, the Department of Food and Agriculture, the State Department of Health Care Services, the State Department of Education, and the State Department of Public Health, shall consider this state policy when revising, adopting, or establishing policies, regulations, and grant criteria when those policies, regulations, and criteria are pertinent to the distribution of sufficient affordable California locally grown and raised, affordable and healthy food.(2) The state agencies listed in paragraph (1) shall, within existing resources, identify opportunities and strategies to improve farm-to-fork infrastructure, including, but not limited to, aggregation, processing, distribution, storage, and procurement systems that support increased access to and use of California locally grown and raised food in public programs, particularly school meals and other nutrition initiatives.(3) The Trustees of the California State University and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall also consider this state policy in their policies, guidelines, and procurement practices related to campus food services and student nutrition. The Regents of the University of California are encouraged to consider this state policy in similar efforts.(c) This section does not expand any obligation of the state to provide food or nutrition assistance or to require the expenditure of additional resources to develop food infrastructure.SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact future legislation to ensure that in reducing the consumption of ultraprocessed food by the children of California, the state promotes the inclusion of California-grown agricultural and whole food products in school meals, which are among the healthiest and most nutritious available, meeting the highest standards for quality, safety, and sustainability.